District of Columbia statutes.
2-209.03

Reciprocal police mutual aid agreements — Personnel benefits.

The policemen and other officers, agents, and employees of the District, when acting hereunder or under other lawful authority beyond the territorial limits of the District, shall have all of the pension, relief, disability, workmen’s compensation, and other benefits enjoyed by them while performing their respective duties within the District of Columbia.

Oct. 17, 1968, 82 Stat. 1150, Pub. L. 90-587, § 3
1981 Ed., § 1-1127.
1973 Ed., § 1-822.